Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1248.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Rye whiskey has deep roots in our Commonwealth's history.(2) Long before Kentucky Bourbon rose to prominence, Pennsylvania distillers were defining the American whiskey tradition with bold, spicy rye.(3) This legacy continues today, as craft distillers across this Commonwealth are once again producing exceptional rye whiskeys using local grain and traditional methods.(4) Distilling rye whiskey supports local agriculture, sustains small businesses and strengthens this Commonwealth's reputation for craftsmanship and authenticity.Section 2. Official State spirit.123456789101112131415161718 Rye whiskey is designated as the official State spirit of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1248PN1546 - 2 - 1234